North Carolina, session 2025, HB807.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. RAISE TEACHER SALARIES
SECTION 1.(a) The following monthly teacher salary schedule shall apply for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to licensed personnel of the public schools who are classified as teachers.
The salary schedule is based on years of teaching experience.
2025-2026 Teacher Monthly Salary Schedule
Years of Experience "A" Teachers
0 $4,450
1 $4,530
2 $4,610
3 $4,690
4 $4,770
5 $4,850
6 $4,930
7 $5,010
8 $5,090
9 $5,170
10 $5,250
11 $5,330
12 $5,410
13 $5,490
14 $5,570
15-24 $5,588
25+ $5,795
SECTION 1.(b) Salary Supplements for Teachers Paid on This Salary Schedule. –
*H807-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Licensed teachers who have NBPTS certification shall receive a salary
supplement each month of twelve percent (12%) of their monthly salary on
the "A" salary schedule.
(2) Licensed teachers who are classified as "M" teachers shall receive a salary
supplement each month of ten percent (10%) of their monthly salary on the
"A" salary schedule.
(3) Licensed teachers with licensure based on academic preparation at the
six-year degree level shall receive a salary supplement of one hundred
twenty-six dollars ($126.00) per month in addition to the supplement provided
to them as "M" teachers.
(4) Licensed teachers with licensure based on academic preparation at the
doctoral degree level shall receive a salary supplement of two hundred
fifty-three dollars ($253.00) per month in addition to the supplement provided
to them as "M" teachers.
(5) Certified school nurses shall receive a salary supplement each month of ten
percent (10%) of their monthly salary on the "A" salary schedule.
(6) School counselors who are licensed as counselors at the master's degree level
or higher shall receive a salary supplement of one hundred dollars ($100.00)
per month.
SECTION 1.(c) For school psychologists, school speech pathologists who are
licensed as speech pathologists at the master's degree level or higher, and school audiologists
who are licensed as audiologists at the master's degree level or higher, the following shall apply:
(1) The first step of the salary schedule shall be equivalent to the sixth step of the
"A" salary schedule.
(2) These employees shall receive the following salary supplements each month:
a. Ten percent (10%) of their monthly salary, excluding the supplement
provided pursuant to sub-subdivision b. of this subdivision.
b. Five hundred dollars ($500.00).
(3) These employees are eligible to receive salary supplements equivalent to those
of teachers for academic preparation at the six-year degree level or the
doctoral degree level.
(4) The twenty-sixth step of the salary schedule shall be seven and one-half
percent (7.5%) higher than the salary received by these same employees on
the twenty-fifth step of the salary schedule.
SECTION 1.(d) Beginning with the 2014-2015 fiscal year, in lieu of providing
annual longevity payments to teachers paid on the teacher salary schedule, the amounts of those
longevity payments are included in the monthly amounts under the teacher salary schedule.
SECTION 1.(e) A teacher compensated in accordance with this salary schedule for
the 2025-2026 school year shall receive an amount equal to the greater of the following:
(1) The applicable amount on the salary schedule for the applicable school year.
(2) For teachers who were eligible for longevity for the 2013-2014 school year,
the sum of the following:
a. The salary the teacher received in the 2013-2014 school year pursuant
to Section 35.11 of S.L. 2013-360.
b. The longevity that the teacher would have received under the longevity
system in effect for the 2013-2014 school year provided in Section
35.11 of S.L. 2013-360 based on the teacher's current years of service.
c. The annual bonus provided in Section 9.1(e) of S.L. 2014-100.
(3) For teachers who were not eligible for longevity for the 2013-2014 school
year, the sum of the salary and annual bonus the teacher received in the
2014-2015 school year pursuant to Section 9.1 of S.L. 2014-100.
Page 2 House Bill 807-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(f) As used in this section, the term "teacher" shall also include
instructional support personnel.
SECTION 1.(g) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction for the 2025-2026 fiscal year the sum of four hundred six million three hundred
thousand dollars ($406,300,000) in recurring funds to implement the teacher raises provided in
this section.

PART II. FUNDS FOR CHILDREN WITH DISABILITIES
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-111.05 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-111.05. Funding for children with disabilities.
To the extent funds are made available for this purpose, the State Board shall allocate funds
for children with disabilities to each local school administrative unit on a per child basis. Each
local school administrative unit shall receive funds for the lesser of (i) all children who are
identified as children with disabilities or (ii) thirteen percent (13%) of its allocated average daily
membership in the local school administrative unit for the current school year.year on the basis
of the reported cost of the services provided."
SECTION 2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of eighty-nine million four hundred thousand dollars ($89,400,000)
in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and one hundred nine million two hundred
thousand dollars ($109,200,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to
implement the plan for weighted funding for children with disabilities on the basis of the reported
cost of services provided developed by the Department of Public Instruction pursuant to Section
7.7 of S.L. 2023-134. The Department shall begin distributing funds for children with disabilities
based on this model beginning with the 2025-2026 school year. The nonrecurring funds
appropriated to the Department by this section shall not revert but shall remain available until the
end of the 2027-2028 fiscal year.

PART III. PROVIDE BREAKFAST AND LUNCH IN PUBLIC SCHOOLS AT NO COST
TO STUDENTS THROUGH AN ALLOCATION BASED ON SCHOOL FOOD
AUTHORITY EVALUATIONS
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 115C-263 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-263. School nutrition services.
(a) As a part of the function of the public school system, local boards of education public
school units shall have a school food authority to provide to the extent practicable school nutrition
services in the schools under their jurisdiction. The school food authority shall offer students two
meals per day, breakfast and lunch, at no cost to the student. All school nutrition services made
available under this authority shall be provided in accordance with federal guidelines established
by the Food and Nutrition Service of the United States Department of Agriculture.
(b) The To the extent that funds are made available for the purpose, the State Board of
Education shall allocate funds to school food authorities at public school units for the purpose of
providing healthy nutrition services at no cost to students. In issuing the allocation, the Board
shall do the following:
(1) Determine the amount to allocate to each school food authority based on an
evaluation of the authority's nutrition services. The Board shall develop the
method and criteria for the evaluation, which, at a minimum, shall account for
the following:
a. The size of the schools served by the school food authority as
determined by Average Daily Membership.
b. The number of students that are eligible for free or reduced-price lunch
and the estimated receipts from the National School Lunch Program.
House Bill 807-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. The funds actually expended in the prior year, which may be waived
if the school food authority was not in operation in the year prior.
d. The extent to which the nutrition services promote health and wellness
by providing food that is of high quality and nutrient content.
e. The extent to which the school food authority uses locally sourced
food and products.
f. Any other information the Board deems relevant to the cost and
operation of the nutrition services.
(2) Ensure the funds are distributed on a fair and equitable basis.
(3) Issue the allocation at the beginning of each fiscal year, except that the Board
may reserve for future allocation a reasonable amount, not to exceed ten
percent (10%) of the total funds available for providing nutrition services.
(c) The State Board of Education may adopt rules regulating the provision of school
nutrition that impose additional restrictions that are not inconsistent with the federal guidelines.
(d) Funds allocated pursuant to this section shall supplement and not supplant funds from
any other source provided for the same purpose."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 115C-264(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Local boards of education operating school nutrition programs shall participate in the
federal National School Lunch Program established by the federal government. and, if eligible,
the Community Eligibility Provision Program. School nutrition programs shall be under the
jurisdiction of the Division of School Nutrition of the Department of Public Instruction."
SECTION 3.(c) G.S. 115C-150.14 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(a1) A school governed by this Article shall provide school nutrition services in
accordance with G.S. 115C-263 and G.S. 115C-264."
SECTION 3.(d) G.S. 115C-218.75 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(p) A charter school shall provide school nutrition services in accordance with
G.S. 115C-263 and G.S. 115C-264."
SECTION 3.(e) G.S. 115C-238.72(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Food Nutrition Service. – The local school administrative unit identified by resolution
shall provide, to the extent practicable, school food provide school nutrition services to the
regional school. school in accordance with G.S. 115C-263 and G.S. 115C-264. For purposes of
federal funding through the National School Lunch Program or other federally supported food
nutrition service programs, the local school administrative unit identified by resolution shall be
permitted to include eligible students enrolled in the regional school. Other participating units
shall not include students enrolled in the regional school for purposes of federally supported food
nutrition service programs."
SECTION 3.(f) G.S. 116-239.8(b)(4)c. reads as rewritten:
"c. Food Nutrition services. – The laboratory school shall strive to ensure
that one hundred percent (100%) muscadine grape juice is made
available to students as a part of the school's nutrition program or
through the operation of the school's vending facilities. Laboratory
schools shall provide school nutrition services in accordance with
G.S. 115C-263 and G.S. 115C-264. Upon request, the local school
administrative unit in which the laboratory school is located shall
administer the National School Lunch Program for the laboratory
school in accordance with G.S. 115C-264.school."
SECTION 3.(g) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of one hundred forty-four million dollars ($144,000,000) in recurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide nutrition services to students in public school units
at no cost to the students in accordance with this section. Should this appropriation not be
Page 4 House Bill 807-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
sufficient to fulfill the provisions of this section for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the State Board of
Education may use funds appropriated to State Aid for Public Schools for this purpose.
SECTION 3.(h) The State Board of Education has authority to adopt temporary rules
to enact the provisions of this section until such a time as permanent rules can be adopted.
SECTION 3.(i) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies beginning
with the 2025-2026 school year.

PART IV. PROVIDE FOR A ONE-TO-ONE DEVICE REFRESH
SECTION 4.(a) Part 3A of Article 8 of Chapter 115C is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 115C-102.10. Device refresh and replacement program.
(a) The State Board of Education shall adopt by rule standards for a one-to-one electronic
device refresh and replacement program. The purpose of this program shall be to provide schools
funds to update or replace electronic devices used directly by students and teachers for
instruction. At a minimum, the standards shall include:
(1) A statewide schedule for routine replacement of electronic devices, based on
the average operating lifecycle of the devices most commonly used.
(2) A description of the lack or impairment of functionality a device must have in
order to be eligible for replacement, including how functionality will be
verified.
(3) Instructions on how to dispose of devices no longer in use, including whether
those devices should be sold or recycled.
(b) Local school administrative units shall administer the one-to-one electronic device
refresh and replacement program in accordance with the standards set by the State Board."
SECTION 4.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of one hundred fifty-two million six hundred twenty thousand dollars
($152,620,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year for the Department to establish
the one-to-one device refresh program, as enacted by this act.

PART V. REVISE OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM
SECTION 5.(a) Beginning with the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the State Education
Assistance Authority shall not award any scholarship grant funds under Part 2A of Article 39 of
Chapter 115C of the General Statutes to new persons who did not receive scholarship grant funds
in the prior school year. It is the intent of the General Assembly to eliminate the program for
awarding scholarship grants under Part 2A of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes
beginning in the 2036-2037 school year or once all current recipients become ineligible for the
receipt of scholarship grants.
SECTION 5.(b) G.S. 115C-562.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.1. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
…
(3a) Eligible student. – A student residing in North Carolina who has not yet
received a high school diploma and who meets all of the following
requirements:
a. Is eligible to attend a North Carolina public school pursuant to Article
25 of this Chapter. A child who is the age of 4 on or before April 16 is
eligible to attend the following school year if the principal, or
equivalent, of the school in which the child seeks to enroll finds that
the student meets the requirements established by the Authority
pursuant to G.S. 115C-562.2(d) and those findings are submitted to the
Authority.
House Bill 807-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Has not been enrolled in a postsecondary institution as a full-time
student taking at least 12 hours of academic credit.
c. Has not been placed in a nonpublic school or facility by a public
agency at public expense.
d. Received a scholarship grant for the school year prior to the school
year for which the student is applying.
e. Resides in a household with an income level between the amount
required for the student to qualify for the federal free or reduced-price
lunch program and not in excess of two hundred percent (200%) of
that amount.
…."
SECTION 5.(c) G.S. 115C-562.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.2. Scholarship grants.
(a) The Authority shall make available no later than February 1 annually applications to
eligible students for the award of scholarship grants to attend any nonpublic school on a full- or
part-time basis. Information about scholarship grants and the application process shall be made
available on the Authority's Web site. website. Beginning March 15, the Authority shall begin
awarding scholarship grants to students who have applied by March 1 in the following
order:March 1.
(1) Eligible students who received a scholarship grant for the school year prior to
the school year for which the students are applying.
(2) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (1) of subsection (b2) of this section.
(3) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (2) of subsection (b2) of this section.
(4) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (3) of subsection (b2) of this section.
(5) All other students.
…
(b2) Scholarship grants shall be awarded to eligible students as follows:
(1) For students residing in households with an income level not in excess of the
amount required for the student to qualify for the federal free or reduced-price
lunch program, per year per eligible student, an amount of up to one hundred
percent (100%) of the average State per pupil allocation for average daily
membership in the prior fiscal year.
(2) For students residing in households with an income level between the amount
required for the student to qualify for the federal free or reduced-price lunch
program and not in excess of two hundred percent (200%) of that amount, per
year per eligible student, an amount of up to ninety percent (90%) of the
average State per pupil allocation for average daily membership in the prior
fiscal year.
(3) For students residing in households with an income level of between two
hundred percent (200%) of the amount required for the student to qualify for
the federal free or reduced-price lunch program and not in excess of four
hundred fifty percent (450%) of that amount, per year per eligible student, an
amount of up to sixty percent (60%) of the average State per pupil allocation
for average daily membership in the prior fiscal year.
(4) For all students, per year per eligible student, an amount of up to forty-five
percent (45%) of the average State per pupil allocation for average daily
membership in the prior fiscal year, unless the student qualifies for a higher
amount under this subsection.
Page 6 House Bill 807-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b3) Tuition and fees for a nonpublic school may include tuition and fees for books,
transportation, equipment, or other items required by the nonpublic school.
(b4) No scholarship grant shall exceed, per year per eligible student, an amount equal to
one hundred percent (100%) of the average State per pupil allocation for average daily
membership in the prior fiscal year, and no scholarship grant shall exceed the required tuition
and fees for the nonpublic school the eligible student will attend.
(b5) In addition to the amount of the scholarship grant, for any student receiving a
scholarship grant in grades three, eight, or 11, the Authority shall provide to the nonpublic school
an amount equal to the cost of the nationally standardized test required to be administered as
provided in G.S. 115C-562.5.
…."
SECTION 5.(d) G.S. 115C-562.8 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.8. The Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve.
…
(b) The General Assembly finds that, due to the critical need in this State to provide
opportunity for school choice for North Carolina students, it is imperative that the State provide
an increase of funds for 15 years to the Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve. Therefore,
there There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Reserve the following amounts for each
fiscal year to be used for the purposes set forth in this section:
Fiscal Year Appropriation
…
2027-2028 $700,000,000$193,664,793
2028-2029 $725,000,000$168,730,451
2029-2030 $750,000,000$147,006,405
2030-2031 $775,000,000$128,079,330
2031-2032 $800,000,000$111,589,117
2032-2033 $97,222,018
2033-2034 $84,704,683
2034-2035 $73,798,955
2035-2036 $64,297,340
For the 2032-2033 2036-2037 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, there is appropriated
from the General Fund to the Reserve the sum of eight hundred twenty-five million dollars
($825,000,000) to be used for the purposes set forth in this section. no funds shall be appropriated
from the General Fund to the Reserve, and it is the intention of the General Assembly to sunset
this award of scholarship funds pursuant to this Part. When developing the base budget, as
defined by G.S. 143C-1-1, for each fiscal year specified in this subsection, subsection until the
2036-2037 fiscal year, the Director of the Budget shall include the appropriated amount specified
in this subsection for that fiscal year.
…."
SECTION 5.(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, funds
appropriated for the award of opportunity scholarship grants pursuant to Part 2A of Article 39 of
Chapter 115C of the General Statutes are reduced as follows:
(1) Of the recurring funds appropriated to the Board of Governors of The
University of North Carolina for the opportunity scholarship program
pursuant to S.L. 2021-180, by the sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000)
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year.
(2) Of the funds appropriated to the Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve
for the 2024-2025 fiscal year and allocated from the Reserve for the award of
scholarship grants in the 2025-2026 fiscal year, by the sum of two hundred
seventy-seven million one hundred sixty-five thousand four hundred
House Bill 807-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
fifty-nine dollars ($277,165,459) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026
fiscal year.
(3) Of the funds appropriated to the Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve,
as follows:
a. By the sum of three hundred sixty-nine million eight hundred
sixty-seven thousand nine hundred six dollars ($369,867,906) in
recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year.
b. By the sum of an additional eighty-two million eight hundred
forty-eight thousand two hundred fifty-seven dollars ($82,848,257) in
recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year.
SECTION 5.(f) This section applies beginning with the 2025-2026 school year.

PART VI. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 8 House Bill 807-First Edition